Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.357

Mortgage loan originator—License required—Nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.

An individual defined as a mortgage loan originator may not engage in the business of a mortgage loan originator without first obtaining and maintaining annually a license under this chapter. Each licensed mortgage loan originator must register with and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.

[ 2010 c 35 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 35: See RCW 31.04.904.